Wisconsin, session 2025, AB19.
do enact as follows:AB19,11Section 1. 343.12 (7) (c) 9j. of the statutes is amended to read:AB19,2,32343.12 (7) (c) 9j. Physical abuse of an elder person or an adult at risk under s. 3940.198 (2).AB19,24Section 2. 813.12 (1) (ab) of the statutes is created to read:AB19,2,55813.12 (1) (ab) “Adult at risk” has the meaning given in s. 55.01 (1e).AB19,36Section 3. 813.12 (5b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB19,2,97813.12 (5b) Elder person or adult-at-risk petitioner. If the petitioner is 8an elder person or an adult at risk, the court shall permit the petitioner to 9participate in hearings under this section by telephone or live audiovisual means.AB19,410Section 4. 813.123 (6g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB19,2,1311813.123 (6g) Elder adult-at-risk Individual-at-risk petitioner. If the 12petitioner is an elder adult individual at risk, the court shall permit the petitioner 13to participate in hearings under this section by telephone or live audiovisual means.AB19,514Section 5. 813.125 (1) (am) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB19,2,1515813.125 (1) (am) 2. “Adult at risk” has the meaning given in s. 55.01 (1e).AB19,616Section 6. 813.125 (5b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB19,2,1917813.125 (5b) Elder person or adult-at-risk petitioner. If the petitioner is 18an elder person or an adult at risk, the court shall permit the petitioner to 19participate in hearings under this section by telephone or live audiovisual means.AB19,720Section 7. 911.01 (4) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB19,3,111911.01 (4) (c) Miscellaneous proceedings. Proceedings for extradition or 2rendition; sentencing, granting or revoking probation, modification of a bifurcated 3sentence under s. 302.113 (9g), or adjustment of a bifurcated sentence under s. 4973.195 (1r) or 973.198; hearings for the freezing of assets of a person charged with 5financial exploitation of an elder person or adult at risk under s. 971.109; issuance 6of subpoenas or warrants under s. 968.375, arrest warrants, criminal summonses, 7and search warrants; hearings under s. 980.09 (2); proceedings under s. 971.14 (1r) 8(c); proceedings with respect to pretrial release under ch. 969 except where habeas 9corpus is utilized with respect to release on bail or as otherwise provided in ch. 969; 10or proceedings under s. 165.76 (6) to compel provision of a biological specimen for 11deoxyribonucleic acid analysis.AB19,812Section 8. 939.623 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB19,3,1413939.623 (title) Increased penalty for elder person or adult-at-risk 14victims.AB19,915Section 9. 939.623 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 939.623 (1) (intro.) and 16amended to read:AB19,3,1717939.623 (1) (intro.) In this section, “elder:AB19,3,1818(c) “Elder person” means any individual who is 60 years of age or older.AB19,1019Section 10. 939.623 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB19,3,2020939.623 (1) (b) “Adult at risk” has the meaning given in s. 55.01 (1e).AB19,1121Section 11. 939.623 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB19,4,222939.623 (2) (intro.) If the crime victim is an elder person or an adult at risk, 23and the present conviction is for any crime for which imprisonment may be 1imposed, the maximum term of imprisonment prescribed by law for that crime may 2be increased as follows:AB19,123Section 12. 939.623 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB19,4,74939.623 (3) This section applies irrespective of whether the defendant had 5actual knowledge of the crime victim’s age or that the crime victim was an adult at 6risk at the time of the crime. A mistake regarding the crime victim’s age or status 7as an adult at risk is not a defense to an increased penalty under this section.AB19,138Section 13. 940.198 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB19,4,99940.198 (title) Physical abuse of an elder person or an adult at risk.AB19,1410Section 14. 940.198 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 940.198 (1) (ar).AB19,1511Section 15. 940.198 (1) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:AB19,4,1212940.198 (1) (ag) “Adult at risk” has the meaning given in s. 55.01 (1e).AB19,1613Section 16. 940.198 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB19,4,1614940.198 (1) (b) “Recklessly” means conduct that creates a situation of 15unreasonable risk of harm to and demonstrates a conscious disregard for the safety 16of the elder person.AB19,1717Section 17. 940.198 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab19 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab19 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB19 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB19 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB19: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting